Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB499.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 164.295 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The six (6) state comprehensive universities:
(a) Shall provide, upon approval of the Council on Postsecondary Education,
associate and baccalaureate programs of instruction;
(b) Shall provide, upon approval of the Council on Postsecondary Education,
graduate programs of instruction[ at the master's-degree level] in education,
business, and the arts and sciences, specialist degrees, and programs beyond
the master's-degree level to meet the requirements for teachers, school
leaders, and other certified personnel; and
(c) Shall provide research and service programs directly related to the needs of
their primary geographical areas.
(2) A comprehensive university may provide:
(a) Programs of a community college nature in their own community comparable
to those listed for the Kentucky Community and Technical College System, as
provided in KRS 164.580;
(b) Upon approval of the Council on Postsecondary Education, [an advanced
practice doctoral program in nursing in compliance with KRS 314.111 and
314.131; and
(c) Upon approval of the Council on Postsecondary Education, one (1) or more
additional ]advanced practice doctoral programs; and
(c) Upon approval of the Council on Postsecondary Education, research
doctoral degree programs, including but not limited to Doctor of
Philosophy, in areas that the Council on Postsecondary Education
determines will directly affect the workforce and economy of Kentucky.
(3) The Council on Postsecondary Education, in consultation with the Advisory
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 2/13/2025 9:45 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1674
Conference of Presidents pursuant to KRS 164.021, shall develop criteria and
conditions upon which an advanced practice doctoral degree program and research
doctoral degree programs may be approved. The criteria shall include but not be
limited to a determination of the academic and workforce needs for a program,
consideration of whether the program can be effectively delivered through a
collaborative effort with an existing program at another public university within the
Commonwealth, and the capacity of a university to effectively offer the program. A
university requesting approval of an advanced practice doctoral program or
research doctoral degree shall be required to provide assurance that funding for the
program will not impair funding of any existing program at any other public
university. The Council on Postsecondary Education shall not approve a request
for an advanced practice doctoral degree program or research doctoral degree
program at a comprehensive university that would interfere with the
comprehensive university's fulfillment of its mission.
(4) The council shall promulgate administrative regulations setting forth the agreed-on
criteria and conditions identified under subsection (3) of this section.
(5) The council shall review advanced practice doctorates and research doctorates
consistent with its review schedule for all other academic programs.
(6) A comprehensive university shall not[:
(a) Offer the terminal degrees of Doctor of Philosophy or Doctor of Musical Arts;
doctor's degrees required for professional practice and licensure in medicine,
veterinary medicine, chiropractic, dentistry, pharmacy, law, or optometry; or
the primary degree required for professional practice and licensure in
architecture. The existing school of law at Northern Kentucky University is
exempted from the requirements of this paragraph; or
(b) ] describe itself in official publications or in marketing materials as a research
university or research institution unless designated as such by a nationally-
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 2/13/2025 9:45 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1674
recognized authority for the classification of research universities. Nothing
in this subsection[paragraph] shall be construed as precluding a
comprehensive university from conducting basic, applied, or translational
research.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 2/13/2025 9:45 AM Jacketed